Utah statutes.
13-10a-8.   Exemptions.

(1)  This act does not apply to contracts between performing rights societies or organizations and broadcasters licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, unless any such society is licensed by the Federal Communications Commission.

(2)  This act does not apply to investigations by law enforcement agencies or other persons with respect to suspected violations of Subsection 13-10-8(2)(b).



Enacted by Chapter 324, 1998 General Session

